Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1424
Franchise; termination; noncontinuance; change community; additional dealership of same line-make;
application.

If a franchisor seeks to terminate
or not continue any franchise or
change a franchisee's community, or seeks to enter into a franchise
establishing an additional motor vehicle, combination motor vehicle and trailer,
motorcycle or trailer dealership of the same line-make, the franchisor shall
file an application with the board for permission to terminate or not continue
the franchise, to change a
franchisee's community, or to enter into a franchise for additional representation
of the same line-make in that community,
except that no application needs to be filed to change a franchisee's community
if an agreement has been entered into as provided in subsection (3) of section
60-1420.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 24;

Laws 2011, LB477, § 3.